District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.42

Building permits associated with street or alley closings or zoning density increases.

An applicant who obtains a street or alley closing or a zoning density increase who is required to construct or rehabilitate affordable housing pursuant to this part shall not be issued a building permit for the applicant’s commercial development until the applicant certifies to the District either that a building permit has been issued for the required amount of affordable housing, or that the applicant has contributed sufficient funds to a housing provider to construct or rehabilitate the required amount of affordable housing.

History

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1500